Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201920-126
Statement of policy.

It is the policy of this state to encourage and enable blind, visually handicapped, deaf or hard of hearing, or physically disabled persons to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment.

Laws 1971, LB 496, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 43-633;

Laws 1980, LB 932, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB248, § 1.
September 1, 2019
This section setting forth a general policy to employ the blind and visually handicapped does not require the employment of firemen with visual defects where the disability would prevent the performance of the work involved. McCrea v. Cunningham, 202 Neb. 638, 277 N.W.2d 52 (1979).